Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 CERTIFICATES OF TITLE
42-6-139. Registration and title application - where made.

For purposes of this section, a person's residence is the person's principal or primary home or place of abode, to be determined in the same manner as residency for voter registration purposes as provided in sections 1-2-102 and 31-10-201, C.R.S.; except that, in applying the terms of those sections, "voter registration" is replaced with "motor vehicle registration" or "off-highway vehicle registration" as a circumstance to be taken into account in determining the principal or primary home or place of abode.

A person's residence for the purposes of titling an off-highway vehicle is the same as determined by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

Except as may be otherwise provided by rule of the director, it is unlawful for a person who is a resident of the state to register, obtain a license for, or procure a certificate of title to a motor vehicle at any address other than:

For a motor vehicle owned by a business and operated primarily for business purposes, the address where the vehicle is principally operated and maintained; or

For a motor vehicle to which subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) does not apply, the address of the owner's residence; except that, if a motor vehicle is permanently maintained at an address other than the address of the owner's residence, the vehicle shall be registered at the address where the vehicle is permanently maintained.

Except as may be otherwise provided by rule of the director, it is unlawful for a person who is a resident of the state to procure a certificate of title to an off-highway vehicle at an address other than:

For an off-highway vehicle owned by a business and operated primarily for business purposes, the address where the vehicle is principally operated and maintained; or

For an off-highway vehicle to which subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) does not apply, the address of the owner's residence; except that, if an off-highway vehicle is permanently maintained at an address other than the address of the owner's residence, the vehicle must be registered at the address where the vehicle is permanently maintained.

A person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, section 42-3-103 (4)(a), or section 42-6-140 or any rule of the director promulgated pursuant to this part 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars.

In addition to any other applicable penalty, a person who violates subsection (2) of this section, section 42-3-103 (4)(a), or section 42-6-140 is subject to a civil penalty of five hundred dollars. The violation is determined by, assessed by, and paid to the municipality or county where the motor or off-highway vehicle is or should have been registered, subject to judicial review pursuant to rule 106 (a)(4) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

A person subject to the penalties imposed by this section continues to be liable for unpaid registration fees, specific ownership taxes, or other taxes and fees concerning the registration of a vehicle owed by such person.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2467, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(3) and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 1003, § 7, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 787, § 3, effective July 1, 1999.

L. 2003:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 2004, § 74, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 823, § 28, effective August 8; (3) and (4) amended, p. 1179, § 20, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 52, § 11, effective March 2.

L. 2013:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2394, § 34, effective June 5.

42-6-140. Registration upon becoming resident.

Within ninety days after becoming a resident of Colorado, the owner of a motor vehicle shall apply for a Colorado certificate of title, a license, and registration for the vehicle that is registered, that is licensed, or for which a certificate of title is issued in another state. Any person who violates the provisions of this section is subject to the penalties provided in sections 42-6-139 and 43-4-804 (1)(d), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2467, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1003, § 8, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 824, § 29, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 52, § 12, effective March 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-138 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-140 was relocated to § 42-6-142.

Cross references:

For registration requirements and exemptions, see § 42-3-103.

42-6-141. Director's records to be public.

Records in the director's office pertaining to the title to a motor or off-highway vehicle are public records subject to section 42-1-206. This includes records regarding ownership of and mortgages or liens on a vehicle for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2468, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 824, § 30, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2395, § 35, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-139 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-141 was relocated to § 42-6-143.

42-6-142. Penalties.

A person shall not sell, transfer, or in any manner dispose of a motor or off-highway vehicle in this state without complying with this part 1.

A person who violates subsection (1) of this section for which no other penalty is expressly provided is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ten days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2468, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 824, § 31, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2395, § 36, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-140 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-142 was relocated to § 42-6-145.

42-6-143. Altering or using altered certificate.

A person who causes to be altered or forged a certificate of title issued by the director pursuant to this part 1, or a written transfer of a title, or any other notation placed on the title by the director or under the director's authority concerning a mortgage or lien or who uses or attempts to use any such certificate to transfer the vehicle, knowing it to be altered or forged, commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2468, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1563, § 376, effective October 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 825, § 32, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-141 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-143 was relocated to § 42-6-146.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-6-144. False oath.

A person who applies for a certificate of title, written transfer of a title, satisfaction and release, oath, affirmation, affidavit, statement, report, or deposition required to be made or taken under any of the provisions of this article, and who, upon such application, transfer, satisfaction and release, oath, affirmation, affidavit, statement, report, or deposition, swears or affirms willfully and falsely in a matter material to any issue, point, or subject matter in question, in addition to any other penalties provided in this article, is guilty of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2468, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 825, § 33, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-141.5 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-6-145. Use of vehicle identification numbers in applications - rules.

A person required to apply for a certificate of title or registration of a motor vehicle shall use the identification number placed upon the motor vehicle by the manufacturer or the special vehicle identification number assigned to the motor vehicle by the department pursuant to section 42-12-202. The department shall not issue a certificate of title or registration card unless it uses the identification number of the motor vehicle.

A person required to apply for a certificate of title for an off-highway vehicle shall use the identification number placed upon the vehicle by the manufacturer or the special vehicle identification number assigned to the off-highway vehicle by the department. The department shall not issue a certificate of title unless it uses the identification number of the off-highway vehicle; except that, if the vehicle does not have a conforming identification number or is a duplicate, the department shall assign a special identification number for the certificate of title and require the owner to place the number on the vehicle.

The identification number provided for in this section shall be accepted in lieu of any motor number or serial number provided for in this title.

After receiving an application for a certificate of title, the department or its authorized agent shall electronically verify with the department of public safety that the motor vehicle has not been reported stolen. The department shall not register a motor vehicle reported stolen in the system until the vehicle is recovered by the owner.

The department shall promulgate rules setting forth procedures to notify the local law enforcement agency upon discovery that a person is attempting to obtain a certificate of title for a stolen motor vehicle.

This subsection (3) is effective July 1, 2009.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2468, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1648, § 41, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 825, § 34, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(3) added, p. 1025, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 248, § 18, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2395, § 37, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-142 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-6-146. Repossession of motor vehicle or off-highway vehicle - owner must notify law enforcement agency - definition - penalty.

If a mortgagee, lienholder, or the mortgagee's or lienholder's assignee or the agent of either repossesses a motor or off-highway vehicle because of default in the terms of a secured debt, the repossessor shall notify, either orally or in writing, a law enforcement agency, as provided in this section, of the repossession, the name of the owner, the name of the repossessor, and the name of the mortgagee, lienholder, or assignee. The notification must be made at least one hour before, if possible, and in any event no later than one hour after, the repossession occurs. If the repossession takes place in an incorporated city or town, the repossessor shall notify the police department, town marshal, or other local law enforcement agency of the city or town. If the repossession takes place in the unincorporated area of a county, the repossessor shall notify the county sheriff.

A repossessor who violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

If a motor or off-highway vehicle being repossessed is subject to the "Uniform Commercial Code - Secured Transactions", article 9 of title 4, C.R.S., the repossession is governed by section 4-9-629, C.R.S.

As used in this section, the term "repossessor" means the party who physically takes possession of the motor or off-highway vehicle and drives, tows, or transports the vehicle for delivery to the mortgagee, lienholder, or assignee or the agent of the mortgagee, lienholder, or assignee.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2469, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 1448, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1564, § 377, effective October 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 825, § 35, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2395, § 38, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-143 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-6-147. Central registry - rules.

The director shall maintain a central registry of electronic files for all certificates of title, mortgages, liens, releases of liens or mortgages, and extensions. The authorized agents shall transmit all electronic filing information to the director for maintenance of the registry. The director shall promulgate rules:

To determine when an electronic signature is acceptable for the purposes of filing certificate of title documents; and

As may be necessary for the administration of electronic filing of certificates of title and all related documents.

The director shall develop a plan to implement electronic filing on a statewide basis. The director shall encourage participation by the counties in an electronic filing system. The director shall begin the implementation of the electronic filing system no later than July 1, 2001, and shall complete the statewide implementation of electronic filing no later than July 1, 2006. The director may grant an exclusion from participation in the electronic filing system upon application by an individual county that demonstrates reasonable cause why electronic filing would be burdensome to the county.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1671, § 30, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 826, § 36, effective August 8.

42-6-148. Off-highway vehicles - sales.

Unless the owner has obtained a certificate of title for an off-highway vehicle under this article, a person shall not sell the off-highway vehicle and a vehicle dealer shall not purchase the off-highway vehicle; except that the dealer may purchase an off-highway vehicle without a certificate of title if the vehicle has never been titled and was originally purchased in:

Colorado before July 1, 2014; or

A foreign jurisdiction that does not or did not issue certificates of title to off-highway vehicles when purchased.

If an off-highway vehicle dealer purchases an off-highway vehicle without a certificate of title, the dealer shall before finalizing the purchase require the seller to sign an affidavit that:

Is made under penalty of perjury;

States whether the vehicle is subject to a lien interest, and if there is a lienholder, the name of the lienholder;

States that the seller owns the off-highway vehicle;

Indicates how long the seller has owned the off-highway vehicle; and

Contains a warning to the seller that falsifying the affidavit is perjury because the affidavit is submitted to a public official.

Upon being contacted by a powersports vehicle dealer, a law enforcement agency shall check the Colorado crime information center computer system to ascertain if the off-highway vehicle has been reported stolen. If the off-highway vehicle has been stolen, the agency shall recover and secure the vehicle and notify its rightful owner. Upon the release of the off-highway vehicle to the owner or lienholder, the agency shall adjust or delete the entry in the Colorado crime information center computer system.

To obtain a title for an off-highway vehicle that an off-highway vehicle dealer purchased without a certificate of title, the dealer must present to the department an affidavit as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), signed by the seller from whom the off-highway vehicle dealer acquired the off-highway vehicle.

A sale or purchase made in violation of this subsection (1) is void.

A current off-highway vehicle registration issued under article 14.5 of title 33, C.R.S., is sufficient evidence of ownership to issue a certificate of title under this part 1 if the off-highway vehicle was first purchased in Colorado before July 1, 2014, and has been registered for at least one year.

Until an off-highway vehicle is issued a certificate of title, the attachment, recording, perfection, priority, renewal, extension, modification, releasing, termination, foreclosure, and any other aspect of a security interest in an off-highway vehicle is governed by the "Uniform Commercial Code", title 4, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2396, § 39, effective June 5.

L. 2016:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 16-010), ch. 69, p. 175, § 2, effective August 10.